Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.125

Alleged perpetrators—Right to review and amendment of finding—Hearing.

(1) A person who is named as an alleged perpetrator after October 1, 1998, in a founded report of child abuse or neglect has the right to seek review and amendment of the finding as provided in this section.

(2) Within thirty calendar days after the department has notified the alleged perpetrator under RCW 26.44.100 that the person is named as an alleged perpetrator in a founded report of child abuse or neglect, he or she may request that the department review the finding. The request must be made in writing. The written notice provided by the department must contain at least the following information in plain language:

(a) Information about the department's investigative finding as it relates to the alleged perpetrator;

(b) Sufficient factual information to apprise the alleged perpetrator of the date and nature of the founded reports;

(c) That the alleged perpetrator has the right to submit to child protective services a written response regarding the child protective services finding which, if received, shall be filed in the department's records;

(d) That information in the department's records, including information about this founded report, may be considered in a later investigation or proceeding related to a different allegation of child abuse or neglect or child custody;

(e) That founded allegations of child abuse or neglect may be used by the department in determining:

(i) If a perpetrator is qualified to be licensed or approved to care for children or vulnerable adults; or

(ii) If a perpetrator is qualified to be employed by the department in a position having unsupervised access to children or vulnerable adults;

(f) That the alleged perpetrator has a right to challenge a founded allegation of child abuse or neglect.

(3) If a request for review is not made as provided in this subsection, the alleged perpetrator may not further challenge the finding and shall have no right to agency review or to an adjudicative hearing or judicial review of the finding, unless he or she can show that the department did not comply with the notice requirements of RCW 26.44.100.

(4) Upon receipt of a written request for review, the department shall review and, if appropriate, may amend the finding. Management level staff within the department designated by the secretary shall be responsible for the review. The review must be completed within thirty days after receiving the written request for review. The review must be conducted in accordance with procedures the department establishes by rule. Upon completion of the review, the department shall notify the alleged perpetrator in writing of the agency's determination. The notification must be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person's last known address.

(5) If, following agency review, the report remains founded, the person named as the alleged perpetrator in the report may request an adjudicative hearing to contest the finding. The adjudicative proceeding is governed by chapter 34.05 RCW and this section. The request for an adjudicative proceeding must be filed within thirty calendar days after receiving notice of the agency review determination. If a request for an adjudicative proceeding is not made as provided in this subsection, the alleged perpetrator may not further challenge the finding and shall have no right to agency review or to an adjudicative hearing or judicial review of the finding.

(6) Reviews and hearings conducted under this section are confidential and shall not be open to the public. Information about reports, reviews, and hearings may be disclosed only in accordance with federal and state laws pertaining to child welfare records and child protective services reports.

(7) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2018 c 58 s 64; 2012 c 259 s 11; 1998 c 314 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Effective date—1998 c 314 s 9: "Section 9 of this act takes effect October 1, 1998." [ 1998 c 314 s 45.]